Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1310
Regulation of location and construction;
limit on taking of property.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Shooting
Range Protection Act, the act does not prohibit a city, county, village, or
other political subdivision of the state from regulating the location and
construction of a shooting range.

(2) A person,
the state, or any city, county, village, or other political subdivision of
the state shall not take title to property which has a shooting range by condemnation,
eminent domain, or similar process when the proposed use of the property would
be for shooting-related activities or recreational activities or for private
commercial development. This subsection does not limit the exercise of eminent
domain or easement necessary for infrastructure additions or improvements,
such as highways, waterways, or utilities.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 10.